Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1417
Elective office, defined.

Elective office shall mean a public office filled by an election, except for federal offices. A person who is appointed to fill a vacancy in a public office which is ordinarily elective holds an elective office.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 17.